Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 6 HEARINGS AND INVESTIGATIONS
40-6-111. Hearing on schedules - suspension - new rates - rejection of tariffs.

Whenever there is filed with the commission any tariff or schedule stating any new or changed individual or joint rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, practice, rule, or regulation, the commission has power, either upon complaint or upon its own initiative and without complaint, at once, and, if it so orders, without answer or other formal pleadings by the interested public utilities, but upon reasonable notice, to have a hearing concerning the propriety of such rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, practice, rule, or regulation if it believes that such a hearing is required and that such rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, practice, rule, or regulation may be improper.

Pending the hearing and decision on the hearing, in the case of a public utility other than a rail carrier, the rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, practice, rule, or regulation must not go into effect; but the period of suspension of the rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, practice, rule, or regulation must not extend beyond one hundred twenty days beyond the time when the rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, practice, rule, or regulation would otherwise go into effect unless the commission, in its discretion, and by separate order, extends the period of suspension for a further period not exceeding one hundred thirty days.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any order of suspension of a proposed increase in electric, gas, or steam rates under this subsection (1), after January 1, 2012, the commission may order, without hearing, interim rates, at any level up to the proposed new rates, to take effect not later than sixty days after the filing for the proposed rate increase. In making a determination as to whether to allow interim rates, the commission shall consider the amount of the revenue deficiency presented by the utility and the extent to which this deficiency would adversely affect the utility during the time period required to hold hearings on the suspended rates.

If a hearing is held thereon, whether completed before or after the expiration of the period of suspension, the commission shall establish the rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, classifications, contracts, practices, or rules proposed, in whole or in part, or others in lieu thereof, that it finds just and reasonable. In making such finding in the case of a public utility other than a rail carrier, the commission may consider current, future, or past test periods or any reasonable combination thereof and any other factors that may affect the sufficiency or insufficiency of such rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, or classifications during the period the same may be in effect and may consider any factors that influence an adequate supply of energy, encourage energy conservation, or encourage renewable energy development. The commission shall consider the reasonableness of the test period revenue requirements presented by the utility.
(2) (a) (I) If a hearing is held thereon, whether completed before or after the expiration of the period of suspension, the commission shall establish the rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, classifications, contracts, practices, or rules proposed, in whole or in part, or others in lieu thereof, that it finds just and reasonable. In making such finding in the case of a public utility other than a rail carrier, the commission may consider current, future, or past test periods or any reasonable combination thereof and any other factors that may affect the sufficiency or insufficiency of such rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, or classifications during the period the same may be in effect and may consider any factors that influence an adequate supply of energy, encourage energy conservation, or encourage renewable energy development. The commission shall consider the reasonableness of the test period revenue requirements presented by the utility.

If the rates established by the commission after hearing are lower than any interim rates established under paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section, then the commission shall order the utility to return to customers on their utility bills through a negative rate rider the difference between the total amount that would have been collected under the final approved rates and the amount collected under the interim rates for the period that the interim rates were in effect, with interest at a rate established by the commission.

All such rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, classifications, contracts, practices, or rules not so suspended, on the effective date thereof, which, in the case of a public utility other than a rail carrier, shall not be less than thirty days after the time of filing the same with the commission, or of such lesser time as the commission may grant, shall go into effect and be the established and effective rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, classifications, contracts, practices, and rules subject to the power of the commission, after a hearing on its own motion or upon complaint, as provided in this article, to alter or modify the same.

Repealed.

If the commission considers factors which encourage renewable energy development, it shall also make findings and give due consideration to the effect of such factors on the utility's ability to recover its capital and operating costs.

The tariffs and schedules required by this title shall contain such information, and shall be published, filed, and posted in such form and manner, as the commission by regulation shall prescribe; and the commission is authorized to reject any tariff or schedule filed with it which is not in the form required by this section and by such regulations. Any tariff or schedule so rejected by the commission shall be void and its use shall be unlawful.

The provisions of this section relating to suspension of rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, classifications, contracts, practices, rules, or regulations pending the hearing and decision thereon shall not apply to cooperative electric associations, but this subsection (4) shall not be construed to exempt such associations from any other provision of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no cooperative electric association shall establish, charge, or collect a discriminatory or preferential rate, charge, rule, or regulation which would be violative of section 40-3-106 (1) or section 40-3-111. Upon complaint filed by any member or customer of a cooperative electric association or by any affected public utility, the commission shall determine whether the rate, charge, rule, or regulation in question is contrary to this section, section 40-3-106 (1), or section 40-3-111.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall not be applicable to a cooperative electric association which has voted to exempt itself from regulation pursuant to the provisions of section 40-9.5-103. Regulation of such cooperative electric associations shall be in the manner provided in article 9.5 of this title.

Repealed.

and (c.1) Repealed.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 495, § 48.

C.L.

§ 2957.

CSA:

C. 137, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-11.

L. 63:

p. 760, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-11.

L. 69:

p. 946, § 43.

L. 81:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, pp. 1914, 1920, 1922, §§ 2, 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(4) amended, p. 587, § 1, effective February 19.

L. 83:

(4) amended, p. 1572, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1041, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(4)(b)(I) amended and (4)(b)(II) repealed, pp. 1301, 1303, §§ 2, 6, effective April 5.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 1531, § 14, effective April 12; (4)(c) and (4)(c.1) added, pp. 1538, 1539, §§ 1, 1, effective April 28.

L. 94:

(2)(a) amended and (2)(c) added, p. 612, § 4, effective April 8.

L. 2000:

(1)(c) and (2)(b) repealed, p. 217, § 5, effective March 29.

L. 2010:

(1)(d) added and (2)(a) amended, (HB 10-1365), ch. 140, p. 475, §§ 2, 3, effective April 19.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3312, § 17, effective May 30.

40-6-112. Alteration or amendment of decision - decisions final in collateral actions.

The commission, at any time upon notice to the public utility affected, and after opportunity to be heard as provided in the case of complaints, may rescind, alter, or amend any decision made by it. Any decision rescinding, altering, or amending a prior decision, when served upon the public utility affected, shall have the same effect as original decisions.

In all collateral actions or proceedings, the decisions of the commission which have become final shall be conclusive.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 496, § 49.

C.L.

§ 2958.

CSA:

C. 137, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-12.

L. 69:

p. 947, § 44.

40-6-113. Transcripts - record on review.

In any proceeding the commission, any single commissioner, or any administrative law judge may order a transcript of all or any part of such proceeding. The cost of preparing the transcript shall be paid by the commission. If any party to any proceeding seeks to reverse, modify, or annul a recommended decision of a single commissioner or administrative law judge, or a decision of the commission, in the manner as provided in this section, then such party, and not the commission, shall pay the cost of the transcript of such proceeding or the applicable portion thereof in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Any party who seeks to reverse, modify, or annul the recommended decision of a single commissioner or administrative law judge or the decision of the commission shall promptly notify the official reporter of the parts of the transcript of the proceedings which shall be prepared and certified by the official reporter. A copy of this notification shall be served upon the commission and all parties. Within ten days thereafter any other party or the commission may serve and file a designation of additional parts of the transcript of proceedings which is to be included. The transcript or the parts thereof which may be designated by the parties or the commission shall be prepared by the official reporter and certified by such reporter, and when completed shall be filed with the commission. The transcript, as so prepared, shall be filed with the commission on or before the time the first pleading is required to be filed with the commission by the party, whether such pleading is exceptions or a petition for rehearing, reconsideration, or reargument. The commission, upon request timely made, may extend the time within which to file the transcript, and if the transcript cannot reasonably be prepared within the time prescribed, the commission shall extend the time for filing both the transcript and the first pleading of the party.

The cost of preparing the transcript shall be advanced by the party seeking to reverse, annul, or modify the recommended decision of a commissioner or administrative law judge, or the decision of the commission; except that the commission may upon objections by such party order any other party to advance payment forthwith for the cost of preparing such parts of the transcripts designated by them, as the commission shall determine.

It is not necessary for a party to cause a transcript to be filed as provided in this section in any case where the party does not seek to amend, modify, annul, or reverse basic findings of fact which shall be set forth in the recommended decision of a commissioner or administrative law judge or in the decision of the commission. If such transcript is not filed pursuant to the provisions of this section for consideration with the party's first pleading, it shall be conclusively presumed that the basic findings of fact, as distinguished from the conclusions and reasons therefor and the order or requirements thereon, are complete and accurate.

Instead of designating portions of the transcript as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the parties, by written stipulation filed with the commission and acceptable to the commission, may designate the portions of the transcript to be filed with the commission. The transcript, as agreed upon and subject to the approval of the commission, shall be filed with the commission.

In case of an action to review an order or decision of the commission, a transcript of such testimony or the affidavits or other evidence under the shortened or informal procedure, together with all exhibits or copies thereof introduced and all information secured by the commission on its own initiative and considered by it in rendering its order or decision, and the pleadings, record, and proceedings in the case, shall constitute the record of the commission. On review of an order or decision of the commission, the party seeking such review and the commission may stipulate that a certain question alone or a particular portion only of the evidence shall be certified to the district court for its judgment, whereupon such stipulation and the question and the evidence specified shall constitute the record on review.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 496, § 50.

C.L.

§ 2959.

CSA:

C. 137, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-13.

L. 69:

p. 947, § 45.

L. 89:

(1) to (4) amended, p. 1531, § 15, effective April 12.

40-6-114. Reconsideration, reargument, or rehearing - application - basis of review - order - exception.

After a decision has been made by the commission or after a decision recommended by an individual commissioner or administrative law judge has become the decision of the commission, as provided in this article, any party thereto may within twenty days thereafter, or within such additional time as the commission may authorize upon request made within such period, make application for rehearing, reargument, or reconsideration of the same or of any matter determined therein. Such application shall be governed by such general rules as the commission may establish and shall specify with particularity the grounds upon which the applicant considers the decision unlawful. Any such application shall, within thirty days after the filing thereof, be considered and acted upon by the commission. Failure to act upon the application within such period shall constitute a denial thereof. Rehearing, reargument, or reconsideration may be granted if sufficient reason therefor is shown.

An application for rehearing, reargument, or reconsideration of a decision of the commission made in accordance with the provisions of this section and the rules and regulations of the commission shall not stay or postpone such decision unless the commission, upon motion by the party seeking such stay or postponement or the commission upon its own motion, so orders; except that orders of the commission issued for the installation of automatic or other safety appliance signals or devices at railroad crossings shall be processed and handled to completion when such application deals solely with the matter of allocation of the costs thereof among the railroad company and the state and the political subdivisions pursuant to section 40-4-106.

If after rehearing, reargument, or reconsideration of a decision of the commission it appears that the original decision is in any respect unjust or unwarranted, the commission may reverse, change, or modify the same accordingly. Any decision made after rehearing, reargument, or reconsideration, reversing, changing, or modifying the original decision may be subject to the same provisions with respect to rehearing, reargument, or reconsideration as an original decision or any such decision may be subject to judicial review as provided in section 40-6-115, at the option of the party seeking review. If the commission denies said application, the original order shall become effective according to its terms, unless the commission otherwise orders, except as provided in section 40-6-116.

If no application for rehearing, reargument, or reconsideration has been made or, if made, is withdrawn, a suit to enforce, enjoin, suspend, modify, or set aside any final decision of the commission, in whole or in part, may be brought in a district court of the state of Colorado as set forth in this article; except that, if any party to a proceeding applies for reconsideration, reargument, or rehearing, no other party may appeal until the commission has ruled on the application. For purposes of judicial review, a decision on an application for rehearing, reargument, or reconsideration shall be deemed final on the date said decision is served on the parties to the proceeding.

Any court may stay or suspend, in whole or in part, the operation of any commission decision under section 40-6-116, even though the commission had not been previously requested to suspend or stay such decision.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 2065, § 20, effective July 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 496, § 51.

C.L.

§ 2960.

CSA:

C. 137, § 51.

L. 53:

p. 470, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-14.

L. 61:

p. 630, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-14.

L. 69:

p. 949, § 46.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 1859, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1924, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1532, § 16, effective April 12.

L. 92:

(3), (4), and (5) amended and (6) added, p. 2130, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(4) and (6) amended, p. 2065, § 20, effective July 1.

40-6-115. Review by district court - mandamus.

Within thirty days after a final decision by the commission in any proceeding, any party to the proceeding before the commission may apply to the district court for a writ of certiorari or review for the purpose of having the lawfulness of the final decision inquired into and determined. Such writ shall be made returnable not later than thirty days after the date of issuance and shall direct the commission to certify its record in the proceeding to said court. On the return day, the cause shall be heard by the district court unless, for a good reason shown, the same be continued. No new or additional evidence may be introduced in the district court, but the cause shall be heard on the record of the commission as certified by it. The commission and each party to the action or proceeding before the commission shall have the right to appear in the review proceedings.

The findings and conclusions of the commission on disputed questions of fact shall be final and shall not be subject to review, except that, in any proceeding wherein the validity of any order or decision is challenged on the ground that it violates any right of a petitioner under the constitution of the United States or the constitution of the state of Colorado, the district court shall exercise an independent judgment on the law and the facts, and the findings or conclusions of the commission material to the determination of the said constitutional question shall not be final.

Upon review, the district court shall enter judgment either affirming, setting aside, or modifying the decision of the commission. So far as necessary to the decision and where presented, the district court shall decide all relevant questions of law and interpret all relevant constitutional and statutory provisions. The review shall not extend further than to determine whether the commission has regularly pursued its authority, including a determination of whether the decision under review violates any right of the petitioner under the constitution of the United States or of the state of Colorado, and whether the decision of the commission is just and reasonable and whether its conclusions are in accordance with the evidence.

The provisions of the Colorado rules of civil procedure relating to writs of certiorari or review, so far as applicable and not in conflict with the provisions of this title, shall apply to proceedings had in the district court under the provisions of this section. No court of this state, except the district court to the extent specified, shall have jurisdiction to review, reverse, correct, or annul any order or decision of the commission, or to suspend or delay the execution or operation thereof, or to enjoin, restrain, or interfere with the commission in the performance of its official duties; but an action in the nature of mandamus shall lie from the district court to the commission in all proper cases.

All actions for review shall be commenced and tried in the district court in and for the county in which the petitioner resides, or if a corporation or partnership in the county in which it maintains its principal office or place of business, or in the district court of the city and county of Denver, at the option of the petitioner. Appellate review may be obtained in the supreme court concerning any final judgment of the district court on review, affirming, setting aside, or modifying any decision of the commission, in the same manner and with the same effect as appellate review of judgments of the district court in other civil actions.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 497, § 52.

C.L.

§ 2961.

CSA:

C. 137, § 52.

L. 45:

p. 531, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-15.

L. 69:

p. 949, § 47.

L. 75:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 227, § 90, effective July 16.

L. 89:

(4) amended, p. 1532, § 17, effective April 12.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 2131, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 2065, § 21, effective July 1.

40-6-116. Suspension of decision - notice - bond - accounting pending review.

The pendency of a writ of certiorari or review shall not of itself stay or suspend the operation of the decision of the commission; but, during the pendency of such writ, the district court, in its discretion, may stay or suspend, in whole or in part, the operation of the commission's decision.

No order so staying or suspending any decision of the commission shall be made other than upon three days' notice and after hearing; and if the decision of the commission is suspended, the order suspending the same shall contain a specific finding based upon evidence submitted to the court and identified by reference thereto that great or irreparable damage would otherwise result to the petitioner and specifying the nature of the damage.

In case the decision of the commission is stayed or suspended, the order of the court shall not become effective until a suspending bond has been filed with and approved by the district court, and sufficient in amount and security to insure the prompt payment, by the party petitioning for the review, of all damages caused by the delay in the enforcement of the decision of the commission, and of all moneys which any person may be compelled to pay, pending the review proceedings, for transportation, transmission, product, commodity, or service in excess of the charges fixed by the decision of the commission in case said decision is sustained. The district court, in case it stays or suspends the decision of the commission in any matter affecting rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, or classifications, by order, shall direct the public utility affected to pay into court from time to time, there to be impounded until the final decision of the case, or into some bank or trust company under such conditions as the court may prescribe all sums of money which it may collect from any person in excess of the sum such person would have been compelled to pay if the decision of the commission had not been stayed or suspended.

In case the district court stays or suspends any decision lowering any rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, or classification, the commission, upon the filing and approval of said suspending bond, shall forthwith require the public utility affected, under penalty of the immediate enforcement of the decision of the commission, pending review and notwithstanding the suspending order, to keep such accounts, verified by oath, as may, in the judgment of the commission, suffice to show the amounts being charged or received by such public utility, pending review, in excess of the charges allowed by the decision of the commission, together with the names and addresses of the persons to whom overcharges will be refundable in case the charges made by the public utility, pending review, are not sustained by the district court. The court, from time to time, may require the party petitioning for a review to give additional security on, or to increase, the suspending bond, whenever in the opinion of the court the same may be necessary to insure the prompt payment of said damages and said overcharges.

Upon the final decision by the district court, all moneys which the public utility may have collected, pending the appeal, in excess of those authorized by such final decision, together with interest, in case the court ordered the deposits of such moneys in a bank or trust company, shall be promptly paid to the persons entitled thereto, in such manner and through such methods of distribution as may be prescribed by the commission. If any moneys are not claimed by the persons entitled thereto within one year from the final decision of the district court, the commission shall cause notice to such persons to be given by publication once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the city and county of Denver and in such other newspapers as may be designated by the commission, said notice to state the names of persons entitled to such moneys and the amounts due each person. All moneys not claimed within ninety days after publication of such notice shall be paid by the public utility, under the direction of the commission, into the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 498, § 53.

C.L.

§ 2962.

CSA:

C. 137, § 53.

L. 45:

p. 532, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-16.

L. 69:

p. 951, § 48.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 227, § 91, effective July 16.

40-6-117. Priority on court calendar.

All actions and proceedings under this title, and all actions or proceedings to which the commission or the people of the state of Colorado may be parties, and in which any question arises under this title or under or concerning any decision of the commission, shall be preferred over all other civil causes except election causes and shall be heard and determined in preference to all other civil business except election causes, irrespective of position on the calendar. The same preference shall be granted upon application of the attorney general in any action or proceeding in which he may be allowed to intervene.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 500, § 54.

C.L.

§ 2963.

CSA:

C. 137, § 54.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-17.

L. 69:

p. 952, § 49.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1533, § 18, effective April 12.

40-6-118. Valuations - hearings - findings - review.

For the purpose of ascertaining the matters and things specified in section 40-4-110, concerning the value of the property of public utilities, the commission may cause a hearing to be held at such time and place as the commission may designate. Before any hearing is had, the commission shall give the public utility affected thereby at least thirty days' written notice, specifying the time and place of such hearing, and such notice shall be sufficient to authorize the commission to inquire into the matters designated in this section and pursuant to section 40-6-111, but this provision shall not prevent the commission from making any preliminary examination or investigation into the matters herein referred to or from inquiring into such matters in any other investigation or hearing. All public utilities affected shall be entitled to be heard and to introduce evidence at such hearing. The commission is empowered to resort to any other source of information available. The evidence introduced at such hearing shall be reduced to writing and certified under the seal of the commission. The commission shall make and file its findings of fact in writing upon all matters concerning which evidence has been introduced before it which in its judgment have bearing on the value of the property of the public utility affected. Such findings shall be subject to review by the district court in the same manner and within the same time as other orders and decisions of the commission.

The findings of the commission so made and filed, when properly certified under the seal of the commission, shall be admissible in evidence in any action, proceeding, or hearing before the commission or any court, in which the commission, the state, or any officer, department, or institution thereof, or any county, city and county, municipality, or other body politic and the public utility affected may be interested, whether arising under the provisions of this title, or otherwise, and such findings, when so introduced, shall be conclusive evidence of the facts therein stated as of the date therein stated under conditions then existing, and such facts can only be controverted by showing a subsequent change in conditions bearing upon the facts therein determined. The commission, from time to time, may cause further hearings and investigations to be had for the purpose of making revaluations or ascertaining the value of any betterments, improvements, additions, or extensions made by any public utility subsequent to any prior hearing or investigation, and may examine into all matters which may change, modify, or affect any finding of fact previously made, and at such time may make findings of fact supplementary to those theretofore made. Such hearings shall be had upon the same notice and be conducted in the same manner, and the findings so made shall have the same force and effect as is provided for such original notice, hearing, and findings. Such findings made at such supplemental hearings or investigations shall be considered in connection with and as a part of the original findings except insofar as such supplemental findings shall change or modify the findings made at the original hearing or investigation.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 501, § 55.

C.L.

§ 2964.

CSA:

C. 137, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-18.

L. 69:

p. 952, § 50.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1533, § 19, effective April 12.

40-6-119. Excess charges - reparation - actions - limitation.

When complaint has been made to the commission concerning any rate, fare, toll, rental, or charge for any product or commodity furnished or service performed by any public utility and the commission has found, after investigation, that the public utility has charged an excessive or discriminatory amount for such product, commodity, or service, the commission may order that the public utility make due reparation to the complainant therefor, with interest from the date of collection, provided no discrimination will result from such reparation.

If the public utility does not comply with the order for the payment of reparation within the specified time in such order, suit may be instituted in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the same. All complaints concerning excessive or discriminatory charges shall be filed with the commission within two years from the time the cause of action accrues, and the petition for the enforcement of the order shall be filed in the court within one year from the date of the order of the commission. The remedy provided in this section shall be cumulative and in addition to any other remedy in articles 1 to 7 of this title provided in case of failure of a public utility to obey the order or decision of the commission.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 502, § 56.

C.L.

§ 2965.

CSA:

C. 137, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-19.

40-6-120. Temporary authority. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 953, § 51.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-20.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1516, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1563, § 1, effective March 16.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 1475, § 1, effective February 26.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 1533, § 20, effective April 12.

L. 93:

(4) amended, p. 2066, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 416, § 3, effective August 10.

40-6-121. Computation of time.

When the day for the performance of any act under this title, the effective date of any commission decision or order, the effective date of any administrative law judge's or commissioner's recommended decision, or the day upon which any document is required to be filed with the commission falls on any Saturday or Sunday, or on any day when the commission office is lawfully closed, the same shall be continued until 5 p.m. on the first full business day following such Saturday, Sunday, or day of lawful closing.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 954, § 51.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-21.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 896, § 4, effective May 19.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1534, § 21, effective April 12.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 199, § 14, effective April 13.

40-6-122. Ex parte communications - disclosure.

Commissioners and administrative law judges shall file memoranda, in accordance with this section, of all private communications to or from interested persons concerning matters under the commissioners' or judges' jurisdiction.

For purposes of this section, "interested person" means any person or entity, or any agent or representative of a person or entity:

Whose operations are within the jurisdiction of the commission; or

Who has participated in a proceeding before the commission within one year prior to the communication; or

Who anticipates participating in a proceeding before the commission within one year after the communication.

Each memorandum filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall set forth the time and place at which the communication was made, the persons who were present at that time and place, a statement of the subject matter of the communication, other than proprietary information, and a statement that the subject matter of the communication did not relate to any pending adjudicatory proceeding before the commission. It shall not be necessary for the memorandum to be prepared by the commissioner or judge, but it shall be signed or otherwise authenticated by the commissioner or judge, whose signature or authentication shall constitute a certificate by such commissioner or judge that the memorandum is complete and accurate. All such memoranda shall be filed with the director of the commission, who shall keep them on file and available for public inspection for a minimum of three years after their submission.

Any public utility may request that the commission conduct a public meeting at which communications otherwise subject to this section may be made without the necessity of filing memoranda. The commission shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations to govern such requests. In addition, the commission may adopt such other rules as are necessary and proper to govern ex parte communications generally.

As used in this section, an "adjudicatory proceeding" does not include a rule-making proceeding or discussions on pending legislative proposals.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2066, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3) amended and (5) added, p. 1797, § 16, effective July 1.

40-6-123. Standards of conduct.

Members and staff of the commission shall conduct themselves in such a manner as to ensure fairness in the discharge of the duties of the commission, to provide equitable treatment of the public, utilities, and other parties, to maintain public confidence in the integrity of the commission's actions, and to prevent the appearance of impropriety or of conflict of interest. The standards set forth in this section apply at all times to the commissioners, to their staff, including administrative law judges, and to parties under contract with the commission for state business.

The commissioners, staff who act in an advisory capacity to the commissioners, and administrative law judges shall refrain from financial, business, and social dealings that adversely affect their impartiality or interfere with the proper performance of their official duties.

Neither commissioners, staff members, parties under contract for state work, or members of the immediate families of such persons shall request or accept any gift, bequest, or loan from persons who appear before the commission; except that commissioners and staff members may participate in meetings, conferences, or educational programs which are open to other persons.

Commissioners shall not lend the prestige of their office to advance the private interests of others, nor shall they convey the impression that special influence can be brought to bear upon them.

Commissioners and presiding administrative law judges shall not own any stock, securities, or other financial interest in any company regulated by the commission.

Violation of this section by a commissioner shall be grounds for the immediate removal of such commissioner by the governor.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2066, § 23, effective July 1.

40-6-124. Disqualification.

Commissioners and presiding administrative law judges shall disqualify themselves in any proceeding in which their impartiality may reasonably be questioned, including, but not limited to, instances in which they:

Have a personal bias or prejudice concerning a party;

Have served as an attorney or other representative of any party concerning the matter at issue, or were previously associated with an attorney who served, during such association, as an attorney or other representative of any party concerning the matter at issue;

Know that they or any member of their family, individually or as a fiduciary, has a financial interest in the subject matter at issue, is a party to the proceeding, or otherwise has any interest that could be substantially affected by the outcome of the proceeding; or

Have engaged in conduct which conflicts with their duty to avoid the appearance of impropriety or of conflict of interest.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2066, § 23, effective July 1.